Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-386.05
Unincorporated mutual associations; hearing on business affairs; notice; expenses.

Whenever, from an inspection of the books and records or a review of the annual report, the Director of Insurance deems it prudent for the protection of the members of any association, he or she may conduct a hearing on the business affairs of the association. Notice shall be given as provided in the Administrative Procedure Act. Actual expenses of the Department of Insurance shall be paid by the association.

Laws 1969, c. 367, § 4, p. 1305;

Laws 1989, LB 6, § 4;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 106.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.